Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-859
Enforcement of act; inspections; testing; methods of analysis; results; distribution.

(1) To enforce the Commercial Feed Act or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the act, the director may:

(a) For purposes of inspection, enter any location, vehicle, or both in which commercial feed is manufactured, processed, packed, transported, or held for distribution during normal business hours, except that in the event such locations and vehicles are not open to the public, the director shall present his or her credentials and obtain consent before making entry thereto unless a search warrant has previously been obtained. Credentials shall not be required for each entry made during the period covered by the inspection. The person in charge of the location or vehicle shall be notified of the completion of the inspection. If the owner of such location or vehicle or his or her agent refuses to admit the director to inspect pursuant to this section, the director may obtain a search warrant from a court of competent jurisdiction directing such owner or agent to submit the location, vehicle, or both as described in such search warrant to inspection;

(b) Inspect any location or vehicle described in this subsection, all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished materials, containers and labeling, all records, books, papers, and documents relating to the distribution of commercial feed, production and control procedures to determine compliance with the federal Good Manufacturing Practice Regulations, and other information necessary for the enforcement of the act;

(c) Obtain samples of commercial feed. The owner, operator, or agent in charge shall be given a receipt describing the samples obtained; and

(d) Make analyses of and test samples obtained pursuant to subdivision (c) of this subsection to determine whether such commercial feed is in compliance with the act.

For purposes of this subsection, location shall include a factory, warehouse, or establishment.

(2) Sampling and analysis shall be conducted in accordance with methods published by the AOAC International or in accordance with other generally recognized methods.

(3) The results of all analyses of official samples shall be forwarded by the director to the person named on the label. When the inspection and analysis of an official sample indicates a commercial feed has been adulterated or misbranded and upon request within ninety days of the analysis, the director shall furnish to the person named on the label a portion of the sample concerned. Following expiration of the ninety-day period, the director may dispose of such sample.

(4) The director, in determining for administrative purposes whether a commercial feed is deficient in any component, shall be guided by the official sample obtained and analyzed pursuant to this section.

Laws 1986, LB 322, § 13;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 20;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 16.